dictsource/ps_rules
.group و
	و	w
	_) و	w
	_) وا	wa:
	و (_	u:
	وع	o
	و (L03	w
	وٗ	u:
	وی	wi:
	وَ	wa
	و (ن	u:n
	_) و (َ	w@      // Initial with fatha
	_) و (ِ	w@      // Initial with kasra
	_) و (ُ	w@      // Initial with damma
	L02) و (L02	w      // Medial between consonants
	L02) و (_	u:     // Final after consonant
	و (ل	wl      // Common cluster
	و (ر	wr      // Common cluster
	و (ی	w@j     // Common ending
	و (ا	wa:     // Common combinations
	و (ې	we:
	و (ۍ	w@i
	و (د	wd      // Consonant clusters
	و (ت	wt
	و (س	ws
	و (ش	wS
	و (ک	wk
	و (ګ	wg
	و (م	wm
	و (ن	wn
	و (ړ	wr.     // Specific to Pashto
	و (ښ	wS.     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	// Common word examples for و using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) وخت	wa'X@t      // Time
	_) واده	wa:'da      // Marriage
	_) ویل	wi:l        // To say
	_) وړ	w@r.        // Worthy/capable
	_) وږی	w@'Z.@j     // Hungry
	_) وطن	wa't.@n     // Country/homeland
	_) ولس	w@'l@s      // Nation/people
	_) وینه	wi:'na      // Blood
	_) وروسته	wru:'sta    // After/later
	_) وریځ	w@'ri:dZ    // Cloud
	_) وږمه	w@Z.'ma     // Breeze
	_) وړاندې	wr.a:n'de:  // Forward/ahead

.group ه
	ه	h
	ه (_	h
	_) ه (L01	h
	ه (L01	h
	هی	hi:
	هے	he:
	هو	ho:
	هُو	hu:
	ه (ن	h@n
	ه (تون	h@n'tu:n
	_) ه (َ	h@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ه (ِ	h@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ه (ُ	h@      // Initial with damma
	L02) ه (L02	h@     // Medial between consonants
	L02) ه (_	@h     // Final after consonant
	ه (ی	h@j     // Common ending
	ه (و	hw      // Common cluster
	ه (ا	ha:     // Common combinations
	ه (ې	he:
	ه (ۍ	h@i
	ه (ر	hr      // Consonant clusters
	ه (ل	hl
	ه (د	hd
	ه (ت	ht
	ه (س	hs
	ه (ش	hS
	ه (ک	hk
	ه (ګ	hg
	ه (م	hm
	ه (ړ	hr.     // Specific to Pashto
	ه (ښ	hS.     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	// Common word examples for ه using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) هغه	ha'Q@      // That/he/she
	_) هر	har        // Every
	_) هېڅ	he:tS      // Nothing
	_) هوا	ha'wa:     // Air
	_) هلک	ha'l@k     // Boy
	_) هلته	hal'ta     // There
	_) هېواد	he:'wa:d   // Country
	_) هوډ	ho:d.      // Determination
	_) هنر	hu'nar     // Art/skill
	_) هوښیار	ho:S'ja:r  // Intelligent
	_) هډوکی	had.o:'ki: // Bone
	_) هڅه	ha'ts@     // Effort/try

.group ی
	ی	j
	ی (L01	j
	ی (_	i:
	یٰ	a:
	یک	j@k    // For compound words ending with کی
	_) ی (َ	j@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ی (ِ	j@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ی (ُ	j@      // Initial with damma
	L02) ی (L02	j      // Medial between consonants
	L02) ی (_	i:     // Final after consonant
	ی (ی	j:      // Geminated
	ی (و	jw      // Common cluster
	ی (ن	j@n     // Common sequence
	ی (ا	ja:     // Common combinations
	ی (ې	je:
	ی (ۍ	j@i
	ی (ر	jr      // Consonant clusters
	ی (ل	jl
	ی (د	jd
	ی (ت	jt
	ی (س	js
	ی (ش	jS
	ی (ک	jk
	ی (ګ	jg
	ی (م	jm
	ی (ړ	jr.     // Specific to Pashto
	ی (ښ	jS.     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	// Common word examples for ی using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) یو	jaw        // One
	_) یار	ja:r       // Friend
	_) یاد	ja:d       // Memory/remembrance
	_) یخ	jax        // Ice/cold
	_) یقین	ja'qi:n    // Certainty/belief
	_) یون	ju:n       // Movement
	_) یوازې	ja'wa:ze:  // Alone
	_) یرغل	jar'Qal    // Attack/invasion
	_) یوځای	jaw'dza:j  // Together
	_) یوسف	ju:'suf    // Yusuf (name)
	_) یاغي	ja:'Qi:    // Rebel
	_) یادونه	ja:do:'na  // Memories/reminders
.group ې
	ې	e:
	ې (_	e:
	_) ې	'e:     // Initial with stress
	L02) ې (L02	e:     // Medial between consonants
	L02) ې (_	e:     // Final after consonant
	ې (ی	e:j     // Common sequence
	ې (و	e:w     // Common sequence
	ې (ا	e:a:    // Common combinations
	ې (ر	e:r     // Consonant clusters
	ې (ل	e:l
	ې (د	e:d
	ې (ت	e:t
	ې (س	e:s
	ې (ش	e:S
	ې (ک	e:k
	ې (ګ	e:g
	ې (م	e:m
	ې (ن	e:n
	ې (ړ	e:r.    // Specific to Pashto
	ې (ښ	e:S.    // Updated to match ph_pashto
	// Common word examples for ې using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) ېوان	e:'wa:n    // Veranda/porch
	_) ېښ	e:S.       // Awake
	_) ېره	e:'ra      // Fear
	_) ېږد	e:Z.d      // Movement
	_) ېږي	e:'Z.i:    // Is being (verb suffix)
	_) ېړۍ	e:r.'@i    // Ship/boat
	_) ېل	e:l        // Separate
	_) ېلاق	e:'la:q    // Divorce
	_) ېمه	e:'ma      // Ordinal suffix
	_) ېنه	e:'na      // Sitting

.group ۍ
	ۍ	@i
	ۍ (_	@i
	_) ۍ	'@i     // Initial with stress
	L02) ۍ (L02	@i     // Medial between consonants
	L02) ۍ (_	@i     // Final after consonant
	ۍ (ا	@ia:    // Common combinations
	ۍ (و	@iu:
	ۍ (ر	@ir     // Consonant clusters
	ۍ (ل	@il
	ۍ (د	@id
	ۍ (ت	@it
	ۍ (س	@is
	ۍ (ش	@iS
	ۍ (ک	@ik
	ۍ (ګ	@ig
	ۍ (م	@im
	ۍ (ن	@in
	ۍ (ړ	@ir.    // Specific to Pashto
	ۍ (ښ	@iS.    // Retroflex fricative
	// Common word examples for ۍ using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) ۍ	'@i        // Suffix for feminine nouns
	_) ۍډو	'@id.o     // Feminine form of "filled"
	_) ۍنه	'@ina      // Feminine form of "sitting"
	_) ۍګۍ	'@ig@i     // Small feminine object (diminutive)
	_) ۍړه	'@ir.a     // Feminine form with retroflex
	_) ۍښه	'@iS.a     // Feminine form with retroflex fricative
	_) ۍزه	'@iza      // Feminine form with z
	_) ۍخه	'@iXa      // Feminine form with uvular fricative
	_) ۍغه	'@iQa      // Feminine form with voiced uvular
	_) ۍچه	'@itSa     // Feminine form with affricate
	_) ۍځه	'@idza     // Feminine form with voiced affricate
.group ئ
	ئ	j
	ئ (_	j 
	_) ئ	j       // Initial
	L02) ئ (L02	j      // Medial between consonants
	L02) ئ (_	j      // Final after consonant
	ئ (ا	ja:     // Common combinations
	ئ (و	ju:
	ئ (ی	ji:
	ئ (ې	je:
	ئ (ۍ	j@i
	ئ (ر	jr      // Consonant clusters
	ئ (ل	jl
	ئ (د	jd
	ئ (ت	jt
	ئ (س	js
	ئ (ش	jS
	ئ (ک	jk
	ئ (ګ	jg
	ئ (م	jm
	ئ (ن	jn
	ئ (ړ	jr.     // Retroflex flap
	ئ (ښ	jS.     // Retroflex fricative
	// Common word examples for ئ using phonemes defined in ph_pashto
	_) ئې	'je:       // You (plural imperative)
	_) ئیل	'ji:l      // To say (imperative)
	_) ئړل	'jr.@l     // To carry (imperative)
	_) ئښل	'jS.@l     // To pull (imperative)
	_) ئږل	'jZ.@l     // To press (imperative)
	_) ئځل	'jdz@l     // To go (imperative)
	_) ئڅل	'jts@l     // To drink (imperative)
	_) ئډل	'jd.@l     // To fill (imperative)
	_) ئټل	'jt.@l     // To push (imperative)
	_) ئګل	'jg@l      // To sew (imperative)
	_) ئخل	'jX@l      // To take (imperative)
	_) ئغل	'jQ@l      // To call (imperative)

// Special rules for common word patterns
.group
	_) زده (کوونکی	zd@_ko:w'@nk@j    // Student (complete word)
	_) کتاب	k@'ta:b              // Book
	_) ښوونکی	S.o:w'@nk@j        // Teacher (updated to use S. for ښ)
	_) پښتو	p@S.'to             // Pashto (updated to use S. for ښ)
	_) افغانستان	afQa:n@s'ta:n     // Afghanistan (updated to use Q for غ)
	_) کابل	ka:'b@l             // Kabul
	_) ننګرهار	n@ng@r'ha:r        // Nangarhar
	_) کندهار	k@nd@'ha:r         // Kandahar
	_) پکتیا	p@k'tja:           // Paktia
	_) خوست	Xost               // Khost (updated to use X for خ)
	_) لوګر	lo'g@r             // Logar
	_) غزنی	Q@z'ni             // Ghazni (updated to use Q for غ)
	_) هلمند	h@l'mand           // Helmand
	_) بلخ	balX               // Balkh (updated to use X for خ)
	_) هرات	h@'ra:t            // Herat
	_) بدخشان	badaX'Sa:n         // Badakhshan (updated to use X for خ)
	_) ورځ	wr@dz              // Day
	_) شپه	S@'pe:             // Night
	_) سړی	s@'r.@j            // Man
	_) ښځه	S.@'dz@            // Woman (updated to use S. for ښ)
	_) ماشوم	ma:'Sum            // Child
	_) کور	kor                // House
	_) ښوونځی	S.o:w'@ndz@j       // School (updated to use S. for ښ)
	_) پوهنتون	poh@n'tu:n         // University
	_) ډوډۍ	d.o'd.@i            // Bread
	_) اوبه	o'b@               // Water
	_) غر	Q'@r                // Mountain (updated to use Q for غ)
	_) غږ	Q'Z.      // Sound/voice (غږ)
	_) ږغ	Z.'Q      // Call/shout (ږغ)
	_) سیند	si:nd              // River   
		_) اږدود	aZ.'du:d     // Tradition
	_) مږ	m@Z.         // Mouse
	_) ږمونږ	Z.mu:nZ.     // Our/us
	_) لږ	l@Z.         // Little/few
	_) نږدې	n@Z.'de:     // Near/close
	_) پاږه	pa:'Z.a      // Strain/filter
	_) وږی	w@'Z.aj      // Hungry
	_) غږېدل	Q@Z.e:d@l    // To speak/sound
	_) غږول	Q@Z.aw@l     // To make a sound
	_) ږغېدل	Z.@Qe:d@l    // To call out
	_) نږغږ	n@Z.Q@Z.     // Harmony/accord
	_) باغ	ba:Q         // Garden
	_) چاغ	tSa:Q        // Fat/plump
	_) دروغ	d@'r,o:Q       // Lie (falsehood)
	_) مرغ	m@rQ         // Bird

// Eastern dialect variation for ږ
_) ږ	g      // Word-initial ږ in Eastern dialect
L02) ږ (L02	g      // Word-medial ږ in Eastern dialect
L02) ږ (_	g      // Word-final ږ in Eastern dialect

// Standard (Southern/Western) pronunciation remains Z.
_) ږ	Z.      // Standard pronunciation 

 
